Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Chapter 10

Intrastate Communication of Criminal Statistics

38-10-101. System established — National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact.

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall establish a system of intrastate communication of vital statistics and information relating to crime, criminals, and criminal activity.

Criminal history information shall be made available according to the provisions of the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, codified in § 38-14-101.

The general assembly approves and ratifies the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, 42 U.S.C. § 14616, as it existed on January 1, 2001, and the compact shall remain in effect until legislation is enacted renouncing the compact.

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall execute, administer and implement the compact on behalf of the state and may adopt necessary rules, regulations and procedures for the national exchange of criminal history records for noncriminal justice purposes.

Ratification of the compact does not affect the obligations and responsibilities of the Tennessee bureau of investigation regarding the dissemination of criminal history records within Tennessee.

Acts 1973, ch. 159, § 1; 1978, ch. 803, § 1; 1980, ch. 636, § 6; T.C.A., § 38-1201; Acts 2003, ch. 186, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 186, § 2, as amended by Acts 2005, ch. 11, § 1, effective March 23, 2005, provided that the state of Tennessee shall participate in the national crime prevention and privacy compact, created by § 38-14-101, until participation is terminated by the general assembly.

Cross-References. Missing Children Recovery Act, title 37, ch. 10, part 2.

38-10-102. Reports by state and local agencies — Report by Tennessee bureau of investigation on law enforcement-related deaths.

All state, county, and municipal law enforcement and correctional agencies, and courts, shall submit to the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation reports setting forth their activities in connection with law enforcement and criminal justice, including uniform crime reports and reports of law enforcement-related deaths.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation shall provide to the commissioner of health and to the general assembly, by March 31 of each year, a report on all law enforcement-related deaths that occurred in the prior calendar year.

The Tennessee bureau of investigation in consultation with the department of health shall have authority to promulgate rules with respect to collection and reporting of information concerning law enforcement-related deaths. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

As used in this section, “law enforcement-related death” means:

The death of an individual in custody, whether in a prison, in a jail, or otherwise in the custody of law enforcement pursuant to an arrest or a transfer between institutions of any kind; or

The death of an individual potentially resulting from an interaction with law enforcement, while the law enforcement officer is on duty or while the law enforcement officer is off duty but performing activities that are within the scope of the officer's law enforcement duties, without regard to:

Whether the individual was in custody; or

Whether a weapon was involved.

Acts 1973, ch. 159, § 2; 1980, ch. 636, § 6; T.C.A., § 38-1202; Acts 2016, ch. 896, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added “and reports of law enforcement-related deaths” at the end of present (a); and added (b)-(d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 896, § 2. January 1, 2017; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act shall take effect April 27, 2016.

Cross-References. Missing Children Recovery Act, title 37, ch. 10, part 2.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

38-10-103. Uniform crime reports — Rules on form and content.

It is the duty of the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations prescribing the form, general content, time, and manner of submission of the uniform crime reports required pursuant to § 38-10-102. The rules so adopted and promulgated shall be filed with the secretary of state pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and shall have the force and effect of law.

Acts 1973, ch. 159, § 3; 1980, ch. 636, § 6; T.C.A., § 38-1203.

38-10-104. Correlation of reports — Annual reports.

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall correlate the reports submitted to the director pursuant to § 38-10-102, and shall compile and submit to the governor and the general assembly an annual report based on such reports. A copy of the report shall be furnished to law enforcement, prosecuting, judicial, correctional authorities, and other appropriate law enforcement and criminal justice agencies.

The annual report required by subsection (a) shall contain demographic data, including the percentage of suspects, victims, and convicted offenders based on race, gender, age, nationality, and any other appropriate demographic, as determined by the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation.

Acts 1973, ch. 159, § 4; 1977, ch. 355, § 1; 1980, ch. 636, § 6; T.C.A., § 38-1204; Acts 2015, ch. 287, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 287, § 2. April 28, 2015.

38-10-105. Failure of official to make report or comply with provisions.

Any officer or official mentioned in this chapter who shall have been notified and refuses to make any report or do any act required by any provision of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of nonfeasance of office and subject to removal therefrom.

Acts 1978, ch. 803, § 2; T.C.A., § 38-1205.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1978, ch. 803, § 3 provided that it is the legislative intent that adoption of this section be construed as a new program.